src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-azhaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ažā: # Noun 26 'eng /est asi/fin' - full paradigm
     ažā+N+Sg+Nom: ažā
     ažā+N+Sg+Gen: ažā
     ažā+N+Sg+Par: [aʼžžõ, ažžõ]
     ažā+N+Sg+Dat: ažān
     ažā+N+Sg+Ins: ažāks
     ažā+N+Sg+Ill: [aʼžžõ, ažžõ]
     ažā+N+Sg+Ela: ažāst
     ažā+N+Pl+Nom: ažād
     ažā+N+Pl+Gen: ažād
     ažā+N+Pl+Par: [aʼžḑi, ažḑi]
     ažā+N+Pl+Dat: ažādõn
     ažā+N+Pl+Ins: ažādõks
     ažā+N+Pl+Ill: ažīz
     ažā+N+Pl+Ela: ažīst
